Louisiana, session 2026, SB67.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. C.C. Art. 2315(C) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
Art. 2315. Liability for acts causing damages
* * *
C. To recover for mental anguish or emotional distress absent physical
injury under this Article, the injured person shall suffer severe, debilitating,
and foreseeable mental anguish or emotional distress, supported by competent
medical evidence, as a result of outrageous conduct on the part of the defendant,
who shall be shown to have breached a special, direct duty the defendant owed
to the plaintiff.
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-315 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 67